California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 company drivers the opportunity to self-organize and designate representatives of their own choosing in order to bargain with transportation network companies, to facilitate the prevention or prompt resolution of disputes between transportation network companies and transportation network company drivers, and to improve the working conditions of transportation network company drivers and therefore the services provided to the general public.

(d) It is the
 policy of the state to establish various notice requirements, conditions, and timelines governing the representation of transportation network company drivers. It is the policy of the state to require transportation network companies and certified driver bargaining organizations to negotiate in good faith pursuant to the act and to set forth procedures for mediation and arbitration for purposes of reaching a bargaining agreement.

(e) In November 2020, the California voters approved Proposition 22, the “Protect App-Based Drivers and Services Act,” which has been codified in Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section
 7448). That measure establishes certain minimum standards for app-based drivers, while allowing, as the California courts have held, the state to create a system for negotiations between transportation network company drivers and transportation network companies, including, by agreement, to voluntarily increase the standards that were established by Proposition 22. This chapter establishes a robust system to authorize those negotiations, while accommodating Proposition 22, which limits the state’s ability to impose certain terms through the binding interest arbitration process that applies if the parties are otherwise unable to reach an agreement but does not otherwise impose limits on that process.

(f) Because of the nature of the industry, many individuals who perform work as transportation network company drivers have only a short-term or highly intermittent relationship with the industry. For both logistical and policy reasons, this chapter establishes a threshold for eligibility to participate in the selection of a union representative so the choice can be made by those drivers who have more than a casual or short-term relationship with the industry and, therefore, have a more significant interest in making that choice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   (AB 1340)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7470.2.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Active TNC driver” means a transportation network company (TNC) driver who has driven at least the minimum number of rides during the past six months with a covered TNC’s platform in the State of California, as determined by the board pursuant to Section
 7470.6.

(b) “Board” means the Public Employment Relations Board established pursuant to Section 3541 of the Government Code.

(c) “Certified driver bargaining organization” means an organization that has been certified by the board as the representative of all TNC drivers in the state for purposes of
 bargaining pursuant to this chapter.

(d) (1) “Company union” means any committee, worker representation plan, or association of TNC drivers or others that exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with TNCs concerning grievances or terms and conditions of work for TNC drivers, for which either or both of the following is true:

(A) A TNC has initiated or created the union, proposed its initiation or creation, participated in the formulation of its governing rules or policies, or participated in or supervised its management,
 operations, or elections.

(B) A TNC has maintained, financed, controlled, dominated, or assisted in maintaining or financing the union, unless required to do so by this chapter or any regulations implementing this chapter, whether by compensating anyone for services performed on its behalf or by donating free services, equipment, materials, office or meeting space, or anything else of value, or by any other means.

(2) A TNC driver organization shall not be deemed a company union solely because any of the following are true:

(A) It has negotiated or been granted the right to designate TNC drivers to be released with pay for the purpose of providing representational services in labor-management affairs on behalf of
 TNC drivers represented by the TNC driver organization.

(B) In the course of providing representational services to workers for whom it is the certified driver bargaining organization, a TNC has allowed agents of the TNC driver organization to meet with drivers at the TNC’s premises.

(C) It has received from a TNC the voluntary membership dues deductions of TNC drivers or the TNC has processed or transmitted membership dues pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 7470.9.

(D) It has received funds from a TNC for the
 administration of benefits and services to TNC drivers pursuant to a bargaining agreement in its capacity as the certified driver bargaining organization.

(e) “Covered TNC” means a TNC that is a covered TNC based on ride-share volume, as determined pursuant to Section 7470.5.

(f) “Multicompany committee” means a committee formed by multiple TNCs for purposes of bargaining pursuant to this act.

(g) “Scope of representation” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 7470.11.

(h) “Sectoral agreement” means an agreement between covered TNCs and the certified driver bargaining organization that meets the requirements of Section 7470.13 and that, if approved by the board, will apply to all covered TNCs.

(i) “Transportation network company” or “TNC” is a person or company that falls under the definition set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 5431 of the Public Utilities Code. A TNC is covered by this chapter only if it provides prearranged transportation services in the state and connects passengers with TNC drivers and only with respect to those TNC
 drivers.

(j) “Transportation network company driver” or “TNC driver” means any person who uses a personal vehicle in connection with a TNC’s online-enabled application or platform to connect with
 passengers in the state pursuant to the TNC license of the TNC. However, this term does not include any individual, who, with respect to the provision of services through a TNC’s online-enabled application or platform, is determined by a final order of a court of competent jurisdiction or the National Labor Relations Board, or declared by a TNC to be a person who is an employee within the meaning of Section 152(3) of Title 29 of the United States Code or within the meaning of Section 31.3121(d)-1 or Section 31.3401(c)-1 of Title 26 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(k) “Transportation network company driver organization” or “TNC driver organization” means an organization that has all of the following characteristics:

(1) The organization has engaged in advocacy for drivers who transport passengers in California, or is affiliated with an organization that has engaged in advocacy for drivers who transport passengers in California, for a minimum of five years.

(2) The organization has experience, or is affiliated with an organization that has experience, in negotiating collective bargaining agreements and representing workers under those agreements, including the representation of workers in filing unfair labor practice charges and in grievance proceedings.

(3) The organization has as one of its main purposes the
 representation of workers in their labor relations.

(4) The organization’s bylaws or other internal governing documents will give TNC drivers the right to be members of the organization and to participate in the democratic control of the organization if the bargaining unit chooses to be represented by the organization.

(5) The organization is not sponsored by, dominated by, or controlled by a transportation network company.

(6) The organization is not a company union.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   (AB 1340)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7470.3.

(a) TNC drivers have the right to form, join, and participate in the activities of TNC driver organizations, to bargain through representatives of their own choosing, to engage in concerted activities for the purpose of
 bargaining or other mutual aid or protection, and to refrain from such activities.

(b) This chapter shall not be interpreted to prohibit TNC drivers from
 exercising the right to confer with TNCs at any time, provided that during any conference there is no attempt by the TNC, directly or indirectly, to interfere with, restrain, or coerce workers in the exercise of the rights guaranteed by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   (AB 1340)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7470.4.

(a) The board shall enforce this chapter.

(b) The powers and duties of the board, as described in Section 3541.3 of the Government Code, shall also apply to the board’s administration and enforcement of this chapter.

(c) The board may adopt rules and regulations as necessary to implement this chapter.

(d) The board may, where necessary and consistent with the purpose of this act, construe any provision in Section 3541.3 of the Government Code, or a related statute or implementing regulation applicable to the board, referring to “employee” or “employees” to
 include a “transportation network company driver,” as defined in Section 7470.2,
 referring to “employee organization” to include a “transportation network company driver organization,” as defined in Section 7470.2, referring to “exclusive representative” to include a “certified driver bargaining organization,” as defined in Section
 7470.2, and
 referring to “employer” to include a “transportation network company,” as defined in Section 7470.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   (AB 1340)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7470.5.

(a) (1) In addition to the TNC driver lists required by Section 7470.6 and 7470.9, within two weeks after the end of each calendar quarter, commencing on January 1, 2026, and at the completion of every three months thereafter, each TNC shall electronically submit to the board a single statewide total of the rides performed during the prior quarter by TNC drivers, as defined in Section 7470.2, on its online-enabled application or platform.

(2) The information required by paragraph (1) shall be produced in a manipulable electronic format, such as a spreadsheet program consisting of cells organized by lettered columns and numbered rows with each data point in a separate cell that allows users to sort and perform
 calculations and analysis. The board may require that the information be provided in a specified software program.

(b) (1) Within 14 days after the deadline in subdivision (a), the board shall total all rides reported pursuant to that subdivision.

(2) The board shall rank all TNCs by rideshare volume in descending order. The board shall begin with the highest ranked TNC and continue down the list until the board has identified the TNCs whose rides collectively equal or exceed 95 percent of the statewide total for the preceding quarter. These TNCs shall be deemed “covered TNCs” for purposes of this chapter.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, all TNCs under common ownership or control shall be considered to be a single TNC. The board shall publish the list of covered and noncovered TNCs and
 rideshare volume information on its internet website. The board shall notify each TNC as to whether the TNC is a covered TNC.

(c) (1) If a TNC willfully fails to submit the list required by this section, the board shall promptly issue a complaint charging the TNC with an unfair practice and petition a court of competent jurisdiction for temporary relief to compel production of the list.

(2) In addition to any other remedy provided by law, a TNC found to have committed an unfair practice by failing to submit the list required by this section shall be subject to a civil penalty, payable to the General Fund, not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day for each day after the deadline that the list was not provided. The amount of the penalty shall be determined by the board through application of the following criteria:

(A) The size of the TNC.

(B) The severity of the violation.

(C) Any prior history of violations by the TNC.

(3) In addition to any other remedy provided by law, a TNC found to have committed an unfair practice by failing to submit the list required by this section shall be required by the board to pay the board’s attorney’s fees and costs for any court proceeding initiated by the board to compel production of the list.

(4) The failure of a TNC to submit the list required by this section shall not prevent the board from providing a list of covered and noncovered TNCs to the extent the board concludes that the missing information cannot reasonably be expected to change whether those TNCs are
 covered or noncovered TNCs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   (AB 1340)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7470.6.

(a) (1) Within two weeks after the end of each calendar quarter, commencing with the quarter ending on March 31, 2026, each covered TNC shall submit to the board the name, driver’s license number, and,
 to the extent known by a TNC, the most recent email address, local residence and mailing addresses, cellular telephone number, as well as the TNC driver’s first date joining the platform and the number of rides the TNC driver completed in the previous six months for each TNC driver who has completed at least 20 rides within the State of California within the prior six months.

(2) The
 list required by paragraph (1) shall be produced in a manipulable electronic format, such as a spreadsheet program consisting of cells organized by lettered columns and numbered rows with each data point in a separate cell that allows users to sort and perform calculations and analysis. The board may require that the list be provided in a specified software program.

(b) Within 14 days of the deadline for submission of the information set forth in subdivision (a) and until a TNC driver organization has been certified as the certified driver bargaining organization, the board shall combine the data provided by covered TNCs and
 calculate the median number of rides provided by all TNC drivers whose information has been submitted under subdivision (a) and shall prepare a list of all TNC drivers who have completed the median number of rides or more in the past six months. Any TNC driver who completed the median number of rides or more shall be deemed an active TNC driver. The list shall include the information set forth in subdivision (a) and shall designate the covered TNC or covered TNCs the
 TNC driver has driven for during the prior six months. The board shall take appropriate steps to ensure that TNC drivers who drive for multiple covered TNCs are not listed multiple times but are listed a single time with the relevant covered TNCs designated. An individual
 covered TNC’s failure to submit the required information shall not relieve the board of its responsibility to timely provide the list required by this subdivision. These records shall not be considered public records under any applicable law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   (AB 1340)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7470.7.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, the board shall determine if an entity is a TNC driver organization within the meaning set forth in Section 7470.2, as follows:

(1) The board shall designate a 10-day period to occur on or after January 1, 2026, and every three months thereafter, during which an entity must apply to the board in order to be designated as a TNC driver organization or to have its designation renewed.

(2) The general counsel of the board shall have the authority to determine if an entity is a TNC driver organization upon application by that entity. The general counsel shall issue that determination within 10 days of receiving the application.

(3) If the general counsel determines an entity is not a TNC driver organization, the general counsel shall state the reasons for this determination. An applicant determined not to be a TNC may appeal this adverse determination to the board within 30 days of the determination.

(b) Once an entity has been determined to be a TNC driver organization, this determination shall remain valid for two years unless it is determined that the entity no longer meets the definition of a TNC driver organization.

(c) The certified driver bargaining organization shall be presumed to continue to meet the definition of a TNC driver organization without the need to apply for renewal of that determination every two years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   (AB 1340)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7470.8.

The certification and decertification process for TNC driver organizations shall follow the procedures set forth in this section.

(a) (1) (A) A TNC driver organization may, at any time after May 1, 2026, present to
 the board proof sufficient to show that at least 10 percent of active TNC drivers have authorized the TNC driver organization to act as their bargaining representative.

(B) Within 30 days of a TNC driver organization request for a board determination under subparagraph (A), the board shall determine whether the organization has been authorized to act as bargaining representative by at least 10 percent of active TNC drivers.

(2) Within 30 days of the board’s determination that a TNC driver organization has
 presented sufficient proof to satisfy subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1), and on every January 31, April
 30, July 31, and October 31 thereafter, the board shall provide the TNC driver organization with the list described in subdivision (b) of Section 7470.6. A TNC driver organization may use the information in the list only for the purposes authorized by this chapter, and shall not provide the information to any third party unless that party is acting
 as the TNC driver organization’s agent for purposes authorized by this chapter. A covered TNC shall not be liable for any damages caused by the TNC driver organization’s or the board’s failure to safeguard the list described in Section 7470.6 from a data or security breach.

(3) Within 30 days of the board’s determination that a TNC driver organization has
 presented sufficient proof to satisfy subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1), each covered TNC shall send a notice from the board to its TNC drivers who were on the most recent list submitted by that TNC to the board pursuant to Section 7470.6, in a form determined by the board, that the TNC driver organization is seeking to represent TNC drivers for the purpose of initiating a bargaining process in order to establish terms and conditions for TNC drivers in the industry.
 The board’s notice shall advise TNC drivers of the threshold for status as an active driver eligible to execute a proof of support. The board’s notice shall be neutral as to whether TNC drivers should support a TNC driver organization.

(4) For six months from the date of the board’s determination that a TNC driver organization has been authorized to act as the bargaining representative by at least ten percent of active TNC drivers, no other TNC driver organization shall be certified as the certified driver bargaining organization of those workers without an election.

(b) (1) (A) A TNC driver organization may, at any
 time after May 1, 2026, present to the board proof sufficient to show at least 30 percent of active TNC drivers have authorized the TNC driver organization to act as their bargaining representative.

(B) Within 30 days of a
 TNC driver organization request for a board determination under subparagraph (A), the board shall make a determination as to whether the organization has presented sufficient proof to satisfy subparagraph (A), and if it has, shall certify the TNC organization as the certified driver bargaining organization, subject to paragraph (2).

(2) (A) If a TNC driver organization seeking certification as the certified driver bargaining organization under this subdivision provides evidence that at least 30 percent but less than a majority of
 active TNC drivers have designated the TNC driver organization to act as their bargaining representative, the board shall wait 30 days before certifying the TNC driver organization as the certified driver bargaining organization. If, during those 30
 days, another TNC driver organization provides evidence that at least 30 percent of active TNC drivers have authorized it to act as their bargaining representative, or a TNC driver provides evidence that at least 30 percent of active TNC drivers do not wish to be represented by any TNC driver organization, then the board shall within 60 days hold a representation election among all active TNC drivers.

(B) The election shall be conducted using a remote electronic voting system that must allow both electronic voting from remote site personal computers via the internet and electronic voting from personal or cellular telephones. The system
 shall not include voting machines used for casting votes at polling sites or electronic tabulation systems where votes are cast
 nonelectronically but counted electronically, such as punch card voting or optical scanning systems.

(3) If the TNC driver organization provides evidence that a majority of active TNC drivers have designated the TNC driver organization to act as their bargaining representative, then the board shall not wait 30 days nor shall it hold an election before certifying the TNC driver organization as the certified driver bargaining organization.

(c) (1) A
 TNC driver organization may submit proof of support to the board to demonstrate that TNC drivers have authorized a TNC driver organization to act as their bargaining representative under subdivision (a) or (b). A TNC driver organization may submit any proof of support that complies with Section 32700 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations. Valid proof of support shall have been executed by the TNC driver within
 the two years prior to the date that the TNC driver organization requested the board determination. The fact that the proof of support was executed by the TNC driver before the effective date of this chapter shall not affect its validity.

(2) For purposes of evaluating a TNC driver organization’s proof of support under subdivision (a) or (b), the board shall use the list
 of active TNC drivers that was most recently issued pursuant to Section
 7470.6 at the time the TNC driver organization requested a board determination.

(3) A TNC driver organization may submit proof that active TNC drivers have authorized the TNC driver organization to act as their bargaining representative under subdivision (a) or (b) on a rolling basis, over any time period that the TNC driver organization elects. If the TNC driver organization does so, the board may evaluate the proof on a rolling basis, subject to confirmation that the TNC driver is still on the relevant list of active TNC drivers when the TNC driver organization requests a board determination. The deadline for the board to determine whether the TNC driver organization has presented proof that a
 sufficient number of active TNC drivers wish to be represented by the TNC driver organization shall begin to run when the TNC driver organization notifies the board that it believes it has presented sufficient proof and is requesting a board determination.

(d) A TNC driver organization may, at any time within one year of the board’s determination that the organization has been authorized to act as the bargaining representative by at least 10 percent of active TNC drivers, petition the board to conduct a representation election.

(1) Upon the receipt of such a petition, the board shall schedule a representation election to take place within
 45 days and shall announce that election date on its internet website. The eligible voters shall be those individuals who are on the list of active TNC drivers that was most recently issued pursuant to Section 7470.6 at the time the TNC driver organization petitioned the board to conduct an election.

(A) The election shall be conducted using a remote electronic voting system that must allow both electronic voting from remote site personal computers via the internet and electronic voting from
 personal or cellular telephones. The system shall not include voting machines used for casting votes at polling sites or electronic tabulation systems where votes are cast nonelectronically but counted electronically, such as punch card voting or optical scanning systems.

(B) If, within seven days of the announcement of the election date, any other TNC driver organization submits evidence that it has been authorized to act as the bargaining representative by at least 10 percent of active TNC drivers, that TNC driver organization shall also appear on the ballot.

(C) Thirty days prior to the representation election, the board shall provide TNCs with an election notice that informs
 TNC drivers of the election date, how to vote, and what the effect of the representation election will be if the TNC
 driver organization receives a majority of valid votes cast. The board shall provide translated versions of the notice in all languages that the board determines are likely spoken by 5 percent or more of TNC drivers. Within seven days of the board’s provision of the notice, each covered TNC shall send the notice, by email, by text, and through the method it ordinarily uses to communicate with TNC drivers, to all of the TNC drivers who
 appeared on the most recent list submitted by that TNC to the board pursuant to Section 7470.6. The board’s notice shall advise TNC drivers of the threshold for status as an active driver eligible to cast a vote.
 The board may provide different versions of the notice that are appropriate for different means of communication.

(2) If the TNC driver organization receives a majority of valid votes cast by active TNC drivers, it shall be certified as the certified driver bargaining organization of all TNC drivers in the bargaining unit.

(3) When two or more TNC driver organizations are on the ballot and none of the listed choices receive a majority of the valid votes cast, there shall be a runoff election between the two choices receiving the highest number of votes cast and second highest number of votes cast. The election shall be held within
 30 days of the determination that no choice received a majority of valid votes. The provisions for notice set forth in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) shall apply.

(A) The TNC drivers eligible to vote in the runoff election shall be the same TNC drivers who were eligible to vote in the original election. A TNC driver organization receiving a majority of the valid votes cast in the runoff shall be certified as the certified driver bargaining organization of all TNC drivers in the bargaining unit.

(B) If a majority of the valid votes cast are for
 no driver organization, then the board shall not certify any TNC driver organization as the certified driver bargaining organization.

(e) (1) A TNC driver organization certified as the certified driver bargaining organization shall have the authority to represent all TNC drivers in the bargaining unit, without challenge by another TNC driver organization, for one year following certification and during the time that a bargaining agreement is in effect, provided that this period shall not be longer than three years following the date of the approval of a bargaining agreement, except during a 30-day window period that shall begin 90 days before, and end 60
 days before, the bargaining agreement expires.

(2) During the times when the certified driver bargaining organization is subject to challenge, TNC drivers may file for a decertification election upon a showing that at least 30 percent of active TNC drivers have demonstrated support for decertification. The board will determine the list of active TNC drivers pursuant to Section 7470.6. The board will then schedule an election within 30 days to determine the TNC driver organization’s
 status as the certified driver bargaining organization. The TNC driver organization shall retain its status as the certified driver bargaining organization if it receives a majority of valid votes cast by active TNC drivers.

(f) The only appropriate bargaining unit of TNC drivers for purposes of this chapter is a statewide unit of all TNC drivers who drive for covered TNCs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   (AB 1340)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7470.9.

(a) The certified driver bargaining organization shall have the right to represent all TNC drivers in the bargaining unit with respect to matters within the TNC driver organization’s role as representative for purposes of this chapter. No other TNC driver organization shall be entitled to engage in bargaining with the covered TNCs concerning
 matters within the scope of representation.

(b) The certified driver bargaining organization shall represent each TNC driver in the represented unit fairly with respect to matters within the scope of representation of the bargaining unit for purposes of this chapter,
 without discrimination and without regard to whether the TNC driver is a member of the TNC driver organization.

(c) The certified driver bargaining organization shall be entitled to receive from the board, on a quarterly basis, within three weeks after the end of each calendar quarter, the lists of TNC drivers provided by the covered TNC to the board pursuant to Section 7470.6. The covered TNCs and the certified driver bargaining organization may, by mutual agreement, change the specification of the data that must be included on the list. The specification of the data that will be included on the list shall be within the scope of bargaining. The certified driver bargaining organization may use the information in the
 list only for the sole purpose of representing TNC drivers as authorized by this chapter and may not provide the information to any third party unless that party is acting as the organization’s agent for purposes authorized by this chapter or administering benefits to drivers pursuant to a bargaining agreement. No other TNC driver organization shall be entitled to receive such a list from the board. Before receiving the list, the certified driver bargaining organization shall certify to the satisfaction of the board that the organization has implemented sufficient data security protection procedures in compliance with applicable data privacy laws, strictly limiting the use of data to
 what is permitted under this chapter, and establishing clear protocols for data breach notifications. A covered TNC shall not be liable for any damages caused by the certified driver bargaining organization’s or the board’s failure to safeguard the list described in this section from a data or security breach.

(d) The certified driver bargaining organization shall have a right to voluntary membership dues deduction upon presentation of dues deduction authorizations signed by individual TNC drivers, which may be in an electronic format or through the covered transportation
 network company’s online-enabled application.

(1) A covered TNC shall commence making deductions as soon as practicable, but no later than 30 days after receiving proof of a signed dues deduction authorization, and dues shall be submitted to the certified driver bargaining organization within 30 days of the deduction.

(2) The right to the membership dues deduction shall remain in full force and effect until an individual revokes authorization for deductions in writing in accordance with the terms of the signed authorization.

(e) (1) Within 30 days after certification of the certified driver bargaining
 organization, the board shall develop a notice of TNC driver rights that notifies TNC drivers of their rights under this chapter and other applicable law, explains that TNC drivers are represented by the certified driver bargaining organization, provides the internet website and contact information of the certified driver bargaining organization, and informs TNC drivers of the procedure for filing an unfair practice charge. The board shall also post a copy of this notice on its internet website, may provide different versions of the notice that are appropriate for different means of communication, shall translate versions of the notice into all languages that the board determines are likely spoken by 5 percent or more of TNC drivers, and may modify this notice from time to time upon request of the certified driver bargaining
 organization.

(2) Within 30 days of the board’s development of the notice described in paragraph (1), and at least once per month thereafter, each covered TNC shall send the notice to all
 TNC drivers who have provided rides within the State of California within the prior six months by text, email, and through the method that the covered TNC ordinarily uses to communicate with TNC drivers, provided that a covered TNC may petition to the board to be exempted from this requirement if it would impose an undue cost upon the covered TNC.

(3) Each
 covered TNC shall provide newly activated TNC drivers a notice, via electronic communication on its digital network, that they are represented by the certified driver bargaining organization upon the TNC driver’s activation and that, if the driver performs 20 or more rides during a six-month period, their contact information will be provided to the certified driver bargaining organization on the next quarterly list. The notice shall be in a form approved by the certified driver bargaining organization and shall provide contact information for the certified driver bargaining organization.

(4) A covered TNC shall, within five days of receiving a request from the certified driver bargaining organization, confirm whether an individual has completed rides through the TNC’s platform.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   (AB 1340)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7470.10.

Once the board determines that a TNC driver organization is the certified driver bargaining organization for the bargaining unit, the board shall notify all covered TNCs, and all covered TNCs as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 7470.2 shall be required to bargain with the certified driver bargaining organization concerning
 matters within the scope of representation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   (AB 1340)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7470.11.

For purposes of this chapter, the term “scope of representation” shall mean TNC driver earnings, benefits, and other terms and conditions of work, including deactivations, which shall be mandatory subjects of bargaining.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   (AB 1340)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7470.12.

Each individual covered TNC shall retain exclusive control over the development, maintenance, design, pricing, and implementation of its product and product features, software, contract terms, algorithm, and operations and areas of service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   (AB 1340)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7470.13.

(a) A sectoral agreement submitted to the board for approval shall address, at minimum, the following subjects, each of which must be set forth separately in the sectoral agreement, unless a subject is expressly waived by mutual agreement of the certified driver bargaining organization and the covered TNCs:

(1) Appeals process for deactivations.

(2) Representation of TNC drivers in deactivation appeals.

(3) Paid leave.

(4) Information disclosed to TNC drivers about trips on per-trip, weekly, and monthly earnings receipts and summaries, and on
 initial ride offers.

(5) Grievance and arbitration procedures to resolve disputes arising under the sectoral agreement.

(6) Grievance and arbitration procedures to resolve disputes about whether a TNC driver has received the mandatory compensation or benefits required by Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 7448).

(7) Safety mandates imposed by the covered TNCs that require TNC drivers to purchase safety equipment or purchase safety software, and safety features or protocols proposed by the certified driver bargaining organization that have a demonstrable purpose of reducing the risk of physical assault or injury to TNC drivers. For the purposes of this paragraph, “purchase” includes an automatic withdrawal from TNC driver earnings.

(8) Labor-TNC
 partnerships.

(9) Reasonable access by the certified driver bargaining organization to covered TNC-TNC driver communication systems.

(10) Deduction of voluntary fees and dues from payments to TNC drivers.

(11) Contributions or fees for a separate fund for the administration of benefits and services to TNC drivers including for TNC driver representation in deactivation appeals and other related activities.

(12) Duration of the sectoral agreement, which shall be between three and five years.

(b) A sectoral agreement, including an agreement recommended by an arbitrator pursuant to Section 7470.14, may address subjects beyond the required subjects set forth in subdivision (a), including
 provisions for earnings and benefits above the minimums guaranteed to TNC drivers by Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 7448). These additional subjects shall be addressed in separate provisions of the sectoral agreement and are subject to nonbinding recommendations as set forth in Section 7470.14.

(c) A sectoral agreement, including an agreement recommended by an arbitrator pursuant to Section 7470.14, shall not contain a provision that does any of the following:

(1) Reduces the minimum guarantees provided to TNC drivers by Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 7448).

(2) Restrains TNC drivers’ flexibility to choose work opportunities as protected by Section 7451.

(3) Alters or purports to alter the legal status of TNC drivers as independent
 contractors as established by Section 7451.

(4) Prevents an individual covered TNC from exercising its autonomy pursuant to Section 7470.12.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   (AB 1340)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7470.14.

(a) After the board notifies the covered TNCs of the board’s determination that a specified TNC driver organization is the certified driver bargaining organization for the bargaining unit, that TNC driver organization or those covered TNCs may request to begin negotiations.

(b) (1) All TNCs
 that are covered TNCs pursuant to Section 7470.5, their agents or representatives, and the certified driver bargaining organization shall have an obligation to negotiate in good faith to reach a sectoral agreement that will apply to all covered TNCs pursuant to this chapter.
